Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5421YC (1) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 476.46A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Each fiscal year beginning July 1, 3 2026, the economic development authority shall be authorized 4 to transfer an amount not to exceed six hundred thirty-three 5 thousand dollars from the energy and water infrastructure 6 revolving loan fund to Iowa state university of science and 7 technology to be used for the purposes of providing financial 8 assistance to the state load forecasting center. 9